src/yanl.xfst
{vejetaryen} (->) {vejeteryan} ,
{vekâletname} (->) {vekaletname} ,
{virüs} (->) {vürüs} ,
{vites} (->) {fites} ,
{viyola} (->) {viyolo} ,
{voleybol} (->) {valeybol} ,
{voleybol} (->) {veleybol} ,
{yakınımdır} (->) {yakinimdir} ,
{yalnız} (->) {yanlız} ,
{yalnız} (->) {yannız} ,
{yalnızlık} (->) {yanlızlık} ,
{yanlış} (->) {yalnış} ,
{yanlış} (->) {yannış} ,
{yayımlamak} (->) {yayınlamak} ,
{yekûn} (->) {yekün} ,
{yumurta} (->) {yımırta} ,
{yıkanmak} (->) {banyo yapmak} ,
{yır} (->) {ır} ,
{zanaat} (->) {zenaat} ,
{zarafet} (->) {zerafet} ,
{zengin} (->) {variyetli} ,
{ziynet} (->) {ziğnet} ,
{çekimser} (->) {çekinser} ,
{çiftlik} (->) {çiflik} ,
{çikolata} (->) {çukolata} ,
{çikolata} (->) {çukulata} ,
{çinekop} (->) {çinakop} ,
{çünkü} (->) {çünki} ,
{ötanazi} (->) {ötenazi} ,
{öğle} (->) {öyle} ,
{ültimatom} (->) {ultimatom} ,
{ültimatom} (->) {ultümaton} ,
{üzere} (->) {üzre} ,
{şaibe} (->) {şayibe} ,
{şalter} (->) {şarter} ,
{şanzıman} (->) {şanzuman} ,
{şarj} (->) {şarz} ,
{şefkat} (->) {şevkat} ,
{şemsiye} (->) {şemşiye} ,
{şifahi} (->) {şifai} ,
{şimdi} (->) {şindi} ,
{şofben} (->) {şohben} ,
{şoför} (->) {şöför} ,
{şoke olmak} (->) {şok olmak} ,
{ıstakoz} (->) {istakoz} ,
{İstanbul} (->) {Istanbul} ,
{İstanbul} (->) {İstambul} ,
{ızdırap} (->) {ıstırap} ,
{ıztırar} (->) {ıstırar} 
|| .#. _
];
